Maryland, session 2026, HB1580.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
12–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Adjusted assessable base” means the fair market value of real property that
qualifies for a farm or agricultural use under § 8–209 of the Tax – Property Article, without
regard to the agricultural use assessment for the property as of January 1 of the year
preceding the effective date of the resolution creating the development district under §
12–203 of this subtitle.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1580*

HOUSE BILL 1580
(c) “Assessable base” means the total assessable base, as determined by the
Supervisor of Assessments or the governing body in accordance with § 12–203(b) of this
subtitle, of all real property subject to taxation in a development district or a sustainable
community.
(d) (1) “Assessment ratio” means a real property tax assessment ratio,
however designated or calculated, that is used under applicable general law to determine
the assessable base.
(2) “Assessment ratio” includes the assessment percentage specified under
§ 8–103(c) of the Tax – Property Article.
(e) “Bond” means a revenue bond, note, or other similar instrument issued in
accordance with this subtitle by:
(1) a political subdivision; [or]
(2) the revenue authority of Prince George’s County; OR
(3) THE MARYLAND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION.
(f) “Chief executive” means the president, chair, mayor, or other chief executive
officer of a political subdivision or the revenue authority of Prince George’s County.
(g) “Development” includes new development, redevelopment, revitalization, and
renovation.
(h) (1) “Development district” means a contiguous area designated by a
resolution.
(2) “Development district” includes:
(I) an extraordinary development district; AND
(II) A MARYLAND ENHANCED TIF DISTRICT.
(i) “Extraordinary development district” means a development district that:
(1) is designated as such by resolution; and
(2) contains at least 50 acres, on all or part of which a federal law
enforcement agency will be located.
(j) “Issuer” means a political subdivision or the revenue authority of Prince
George’s County that issues a bond under this subtitle.

HOUSE BILL 1580 3
(K) “MARYLAND ENHANCED TIF DISTRICT” MEANS A DEVELOPMENT
DISTRICT WITH A DEVELOPMENT PROJECT OR PLAN:
(1) (I) THAT INCLUDES A CONVENTION CENTER; OR
(II) THAT IS WITHIN 1/2 MILE OF A TRANSIT STATION IN THE
STATE;
(2) THAT EXCEEDS $500,000,000 IN TOTAL PROJECT COSTS; AND
(3) FOR WHICH THE LOCAL JURISDICTION HAS APPROVED TAX
INCREMENT FINANCING.
[(k)] (L) “MEDCO obligation” means a bond, note, or other similar instrument
that the Maryland Economic Development Corporation issues under authority other than
this subtitle to finance the cost of infrastructure improvements located in or supporting a
transit–oriented development, a sustainable community, a RISE zone, A MARYLAND
ENHANCED TIF DISTRICT, or a State hospital redevelopment.
[(l)] (M) “Original base” means the assessable base:
(1) as of January 1 of the year preceding the effective date of the resolution
creating the development district under § 12–203 of this subtitle; or
(2) if the political subdivision determined the original base in accordance
with § 12–203(b) of this subtitle, the base value as established in the resolution.
[(m)] (N) “Original full cash value” means the dollar amount that is determined
by dividing the original base by the assessment ratio used to determine the original base.
[(n)] (O) “Original taxable value” means for any tax year the dollar amount that
is:
(1) the adjusted assessable base, if an adjusted assessable base applies; or
(2) in all other cases, the lesser of:
(i) the product of multiplying the original full cash value by the
assessment ratio applicable to that tax year; and
(ii) the original base.
[(o)] (P) “Political subdivision” means a county or a municipal corporation.

HOUSE BILL 1580
[(p)] (Q) “RISE zone” means an area designated as a Regional Institution
Strategic Enterprise zone under § 5–1404 of this article.
[(q)] (R) “State hospital redevelopment” means any combination of private or
public commercial, residential, or recreational uses, improvements, and facilities that:
(1) is part of a comprehensive coordinated development plan or strategy
involving:
(i) property that was occupied formerly by a State facility, as
defined in § 10–101 of the Health – General Article, or a State residential center, as defined
in § 7–101 of the Health – General Article; or
(ii) property that is adjacent or reasonably proximate to property
that was occupied formerly by a State facility, as defined in § 10–101 of the
Health – General Article, or a State residential center, as defined in § 7–101 of the
Health – General Article;
(2) in accordance with design development principles, maximizes use of the
property by those constituencies it is intended to serve; and
(3) is designated as a State hospital redevelopment by:
(i) the Smart Growth Subcabinet established under § 9–1406 of the
State Government Article; and
(ii) the local government or multicounty agency with land use and
planning responsibility for the relevant area.
[(r)] (S) (1) “Sustainable community” has the meaning stated in § 6–201 of
the Housing and Community Development Article.
(2) “Sustainable community” includes a portion of a sustainable
community.
[(s)] (T) “Tax increment” means for any tax year the amount by which the
assessable base as of January 1 of the preceding tax year exceeds the original base taxable
value divided by the assessment ratio used to determine the original taxable value.
[(t)] (U) “Tax year” means the period from July 1 of a calendar year through
June 30 of the next calendar year.
[(u)] (V) “Transit–oriented development” has the meaning stated in § 7–101 of
the Transportation Article.
12–204.

HOUSE BILL 1580 5
(a) Notwithstanding any limitation of law, an issuer may issue bonds from time
to time to finance the development of an industrial, commercial, or residential area.
(b) To issue bonds under this subtitle, the governing body of a political subdivision
shall adopt an ordinance that:
(1) describes the proposed undertaking; and
(2) states:
(i) that the governing body has complied with §§ 12–203 and
12–208(c) and (d) of this subtitle;
(ii) the maximum principal amount of the bonds; and
(iii) the maximum rate of interest on the bonds.
(c) The ordinance may specify the following for bonds issued to carry out the
financing of the proposed undertaking:
(1) the principal amount;
(2) the rate of interest;
(3) the manner and terms of sale, WHICH MAY BE A PRIVATE OR PUBLIC
SALE AS DETERMINED BY THE ISSUER;
(4) the time of execution, issuance, and delivery;
(5) the form and denomination;
(6) the manner in which, and the times and places at which principal and
interest shall be paid;
(7) conditions for redemption before maturity; or
(8) other provisions consistent with this subtitle that the governing body of
the political subdivision determines are necessary or desirable.
(d) The revenue authority of Prince George’s County may issue bonds in
accordance with an ordinance adopted by the governing body of Prince George’s County.
(e) The ordinance may specify the items listed in subsection (c) of this section or
may authorize:
(1) the finance board to specify those items by resolution or ordinance; or

HOUSE BILL 1580
(2) the chief executive to specify those items by executive order.
(f) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, neither an
ordinance authorizing the bonds nor an ordinance, resolution, or executive order issued,
passed, or adopted under this section may be subject to referendum because of any other
State or local law.
(2) An ordinance that authorizes the pledge of the full faith and credit of a
political subdivision to the payment of principal and interest on a bond is subject to any
applicable right to referendum.
(G) ON APPROVAL FROM THE BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS, THE MARYLAND
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION MAY ISSUE BONDS FOR THE MARYLAND
ENHANCED TIF DISTRICT UNDER § 12–210 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
12–210.
(a) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the governing body of a
political subdivision that is not the issuer may pledge under an agreement that its property
taxes levied on the tax increment shall be paid into the special fund for the development
district, a RISE zone, or a sustainable community.
(2) The agreement shall:
(i) be in writing;
(ii) be executed by the governing bodies of the issuer and the political
subdivision making the pledge; and
(iii) run to the benefit of and be enforceable on behalf of any
bondholder.
(3) (i) This paragraph applies only in Prince George’s County.
(ii) Subject to § 18–310 of the Land Use Article, the
Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning Commission may enter into an agreement
with Prince George’s County to pay all or a portion of the property taxes levied by the county
under §§ 18–304, 18–306, and 18–307 of the Land Use Article on the tax increment in an
extraordinary development district in the county to the county for deposit into a special
fund for the extraordinary development district.
(iii) The agreement authorized under subparagraph (ii) of this
paragraph shall:
1. be in writing; and

HOUSE BILL 1580 7
2. be executed by the governing body of Prince George’s
County and, on proper authorization, the Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning
Commission.
(iv) The Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning Commission
may not be an obligor for any bonds issued by Prince George’s County for an extraordinary
development district.
(b) The governing body of Prince George’s County may also pledge hotel rental
tax revenues to the special fund.
(c) The governing body of a political subdivision, including the issuer, may pledge
by or under a resolution, including by an agreement with the issuer, as applicable, that
alternative local tax revenues generated within, or that are otherwise determined to be
attributable to, a development district that is a transit–oriented development, a RISE zone,
a sustainable community, A MARYLAND ENHANCED TIF DISTRICT, or a State hospital
redevelopment be paid, as provided in the resolution, into the special fund to:
(1) secure the payment of debt service on bonds or MEDCO obligations; or
(2) be applied to the other purposes stated in § 12–209 of this subtitle.
(d) (1) With the approval by resolution of the governing body of a political
subdivision, the Maryland Economic Development Corporation may pledge alternative
revenues generated within or otherwise directly attributable to a project located in an
approved development district, a transit–oriented development, a RISE zone, a sustainable
community, or a State hospital redevelopment.
(2) The revenues pledged in accordance with paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall be paid, as provided in the resolution, into the special fund for the
development district, transit–oriented development, RISE zone, sustainable community, or
State hospital redevelopment to:
(i) secure the payment of debt service on bonds or MEDCO
obligations;
(ii) support the Strategic Infrastructure Revolving Loan Fund
established under § 10–134 of this division; or
(iii) be applied to the other purposes stated in § 12–209 of this
subtitle.
(E) ON THE RECOMMENDATION OF THE MARYLAND ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION, THE BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS MAY AUTHORIZE
THE PLEDGE BY THE STATE OF ALTERNATIVE REVENUES TO PROJECTS IN A
MARYLAND ENHANCED TIF DISTRICT, INCLUDING:

HOUSE BILL 1580
(1) ALL OR A PORTION OF THE INCREMENTAL SALES TAXES FROM THE
MARYLAND ENHANCED TIF DISTRICT; AND
(2) ALL OR A PORTION OF THE INCREMENTAL INCOME TAXES FROM
THE MARYLAND ENHANCED TIF DISTRICT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.